Connecticut, session 2026, HB05097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to eliminate
the qualifying income thresholds for the personal income tax deductions
for Social Security benefits, pension or annuity income and distributions
from individual retirement accounts.